District of Columbia statutes.
2-359.09

Interest.

Interest on amounts found due to a contractor on claims shall be payable at a rate set in § 28-3302(b) applicable to judgments against the District government from the date the contracting officer receives the claim until payment of the claim. Interest on amounts found due to the District from a contractor on claims shall be payable at the rate set in § 28-3302(b) applicable to judgments against the District government from the date the contractor receives a contracting officer’s written decision asserting the claim on behalf of the District until payment of the claim.

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 909, 58 DCR 1185
2001 Ed., § 2-308.06.